Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 15. Taxation and Revenue
§ 11. Uniformity of assessment required.

All property, except as in this constitution otherwise provided, shall be uniformly valued at its full value as defined by the legislature, in three (3) classes as follows:

Gross production of minerals and mine products in lieu of taxes on the land where produced;

Property used for industrial purposes as defined by the legislature; and

All other property, real and personal.

The legislature shall prescribe the percentage of value which shall be assessed within each designated class. All taxable property shall be valued at its full value as defined by the legislature except agricultural and grazing lands which shall be valued according to the capability of the land to produce agricultural products under normal conditions. The percentage of value prescribed for industrial property shall not be more than forty percent (40%) higher nor more than four (4) percentage points more than the percentage prescribed for property other than minerals.

The legislature shall not create new classes or subclasses or authorize any property to be assessed at a rate other than the rates set for authorized classes.

All taxation shall be equal and uniform within each class of property. The legislature shall prescribe such regulations as shall secure a just valuation for taxation of all property, real and personal. (As amended by Laws 1988, Senate Joint Resolution No. 7, p. 283.)

Cross references. —

As to assessment and taxation of property, see §§

39-11-101

et seq. and

39-13-101

et seq.

Construction with declaration of rights. —

Declaration of rights requiring uniform taxation must be construed with the revenue article. Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Right to uniform assessment. —

Taxpayer has right to have all taxable property assessed uniformly, and departure from uniform rate, if made in illegal manner where his property is assessed at full value, is a discrimination, and not only a fraud against him, but violation of this section. Bunten v. Rock Springs Grazing Ass'n, 29 Wyo. 461, 215 P. 244,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1923) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Not every discrimination should render an assessment or tax invalid

either in whole or in part. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Uniformity of assessment requires only that method of appraisal be consistently applied.

Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Change in allocation between one county and another did not violate provision. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's ruling that changed the allocation of the company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county did not violate Wyo. Const. art. XV, §§ 3 and 11 or Wyo. Const. art. I, § 34 because the company had the burden of showing unconstitutionality and it failed to meet the burden imposed on it in this regard. Moreover, the arguments were not supported by reference to pertinent authority or by cogent argument. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

County Board of Equalization and State Board of Equalization did not violate Wyo. Const. art. XV, § 11 because the fair market value of the taxpayer's personal property at its coal mines that were purchased in 1998 was determined using a rational method, equally applied, that resulted in essential fairness. The assessor's use of the purchase price as the starting place for the cost method of appraisal was consistent with the regulations, applicable law, and guidelines, which seemed to direct it; and the assessor correctly reasoned that the recentness of the purchase obviated the need to do an economic obsolescence calculation because the 1998 value was derived from an arms length transaction, was provided by the taxpayer, and fairly included economic obsolescence in 2001. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Campbell County, 2006 WY 44, 132 P.3d 801,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2006).

Including reimbursements in assessment process applies retroactively. —

The decision in Enron Oil & Gas Co. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 820 P.2d 977,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1991), which held that the department of revenue and taxation can include ad valorem tax reimbursements as a component in the assessment process for determining fair cash market value of minerals, including natural gas, should be applied retroactively. Under the Wyoming constitution, minerals are a class of property and, as such, they must be uniformly given full value. Limiting Enron to prospective application would have the effect of taxing mineral producers who reported reimbursements as part of value at a higher rate than those who failed to report. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n v. BHP Petroleum Co., 856 P.2d 428,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1993).

Rule promulgated by state board of equalization violated uniformity provision. —

See Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied, 749 P.2d 221,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1988).

All minerals of like kind need not be assigned same value. —

This section and art. 1, § 28, Wyo. Const., do not require that all minerals of the like kind be assigned the same value. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

The constitution of the state of Wyoming does not require the inclusion in a cost appraisal formula to establish the value of mine products of hypothetical costs not borne by a particular mining enterprise in order to tax that firm equally and uniformly with those firms which actually do have such costs. Appeal of Monolith Portland Midwest Co., 574 P.2d 757, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 265 (Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Department of revenue and taxation was not required to continue invalid pricing system

used in 1985 for determining the severance tax on uranium, where the system afforded no reasonable relationship to market value and was illegal and contrary to the constitutional mandates of equal and uniform taxation. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Different basis for assessing golf grounds illegal. —

A county assessor's reassessment use of a commercial square-footage appraisal for golf grounds, as compared to an agricultural land basis for the comparable properties of another country club, was illegal. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Omission to assess property

either from mistake of law or fact, or accidentally, did not protect other taxpayers from the tax assessed against them. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Board authorized to equalize valuations. —

Under § 10 of this article, as to powers of state board of equalization, in connection with this section, requiring uniform assessment, the legislature had power to authorize such board to equalize valuations for other purposes than the state tax. Baker v. Paxton, 29 Wyo. 500, 215 P. 257,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1923) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

The state board of equalization has authority to equalize the values where that is appropriate in order to meet the constitutional requirements and the burden is on the taxpayer to establish any overevaluation. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293, 1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185 (Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Uniform assessment requires method of establishing fair value. —

Uniform assessment for taxation could scarcely be accomplished unless there existed some method of establishing fair value. Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

In performing its constitutional and statutory functions the state board of equalization may arrive at different valuations for different property, but the method or system used by the board must lead to a fair value, and the properties must be assessed at a uniform rate. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293, 1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185 (Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Replacement-cost theory held proper. —

Even though the board of equalization may have in part used the replacement-cost theory of assessment, which gives a higher value, this in itself would not violate the plaintiff's constitutional rights as long as the method is uniformly used in all assessments. Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Reassessment protested on first statutorily provided opportunity. —

A reassessment amount may be protested by the taxpayer, before the county and state board, on the first statutorily provided occasion available after the reassessment has occurred, even if during the next year, after the protest period has passed. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Judicial review. —

Courts cannot correct judgment of board of equalization for error in ordering increase of assessments in a county. State ex rel. Greenwood v. Pearson, 46 Wyo. 307, 26 P.2d 641,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1933) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Taxpayer was required to exhaust administrative remedies before bringing declaratory judgment action; constitutionally-established and statutorily-directed agency was proper forum for initial review of challenge to tax assessment. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. State, 839 P.2d 356,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1992).

Valuation upheld. —

In an action to compel the county commissioners to increase assessments as ordered by the board of equalization, the evidence did not show an erroneous method in fixing values in Crook County. State ex rel. Greenwood v. Pearson, 46 Wyo. 307, 26 P.2d 641,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1933) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Charge that board of equalization ordering increase of assessments on grazing and dry farm lands acted fraudulently, arbitrarily or intentionally discriminated against taxpayers in said county was not supported by the evidence. State ex rel. Greenwood v. Pearson, 46 Wyo. 307, 26 P.2d 641, 1933 Wyo. LEXIS 45 (Wyo. 1933) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

The board of equalization found in relation between the value of the railway in Wyoming and the system value by considering the relative mileage in the railroad within and without the state, by comparing the cost of reproduction less depreciation of the Wyoming property with the agreed system value and by comparing the operating net revenues from Wyoming lines with the revenue of the system. It was held that the evidence was insufficient to support the finding that the valuation of the railway for state tax purposes was arbitrary or unreasonable or that the property was overvalued. Rowley v. Chicago & N. R. Co., 293 U.S. 102, 55 S. Ct. 55, 79 L. Ed. 222, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 8 (U.S.), reh'g denied, 293 U.S. 632, 55 S. Ct. 211, 79 L. Ed. 717, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 441 (U.S. 1934) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

A method of valuation which, as applied, had the effect of arriving at the value of the mineral at the mine by separating, as components of the total sales price, the value attributable to processing or transportation and the value of the mineral at the mine was not arbitrary, capricious or abuse of discretion, and its application was proper and legally justified. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293, 1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185 (Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Where a valuation formula was applied only to three companies and comparative valuations were made of the product of other mines, lack of uniformity resulting in illegality of the assessment was not shown, since there were discrepancies in the sales prices of the coal involved similar and proportionate to the discrepancy in valuations, and the record demonstrated that the comparative valuations were made using as a base the valuations reached pursuant to the formula or through an approach which was equivalent to the formula. This resulted in uniformity of assessment, not lack of uniformity. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293, 1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185 (Wyo. 1976) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Substantial evidence existed to support the use of the cost and income method of appraisal to determine the fair market value of sugar factory; factory owner's argument that the market approach was a more rational method of appraisal was misguided where the record was replete with evidence which supported the cost and income approach. Holly Sugar Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 839 P.2d 959,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1992).

By refusing to allow first year depreciation and by establishing the 40% floor for depreciation of used equipment of gas company the county assessor did not create an unconstitutional subclass of property because other property within the industrial property class was not valued under the same methodology. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 899 P.2d 855,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

Adopting for the plaintiff the adjustment it sought, that is, applying a Wyoming market to book ratio, rather than a system market to book ratio, in the valuation of its tax exempt property, would have resulted in an improper deviation from the uniformity requirement. Pacificorp, Inc. v. Department of Revenue, 13 P.3d 256,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. Sept. 6, 2001).

Board of Equalization's decision affirming the Department of Revenue's setting of the point of valuation for coal production was consistent with the constitutional requirements of uniformity and equality as the testimony and prior Board decisions showed that the Department had consistently applied the statute to locate Wyoming mine mouths at the point where the minerals actually reached the surface. Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2017 WY 6, 387 P.3d 725,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2017).

Valuation of intangible personal property. —

Although intangible personal property is exempt from taxation, it may add value to taxable, tangible property, and to that extent, it should be included in any assessment in order to properly reflect the true value of the property; in utilizing the unitary method, however, to the extent that intangible property has value beyond any enhancing effect on tangible property and is separable from those assets, it must be excluded. RT Communs. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 11 P.3d 915,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Oct. 26, 2000).

Electric utilities. —

There was no rational basis for treating non-profit electric utilities differently from investor-owned utilities for purposes of ad valorem taxation, and therefore valuation of rural electric cooperative's property constituted an abuse of discretion and was unconstitutional. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Tax exempt property. —

A utility's tax exempt property would be valued, for tax assessment purposes, using the same valuation method as that used for its taxable property, in order to assure an ultimate fair market value, as commanded by section

39-11-101

(a)(vi) and Wyo. Const., art. 15, § 11. Pacificorp, Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2001 WY 84, 31 P.3d 64,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2001).

Irrigation district law

was not in violation of this section. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Taxation of livestock. —

An act providing for the taxation of livestock brought into the state to graze did not violate the provisions of this section. Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1898) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

City ordinance not authorized. —

City council was not authorized to pass ordinance taxing each lot certain amount for water for irrigation, regardless of value of the property. Town Council of Hudson v. Board of Comm'rs, 37 Wyo. 160, 259 P. 1051,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1927) (decided prior to 1988 amendment).

Veterans' exemption. —

See State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923).

Applied

in

Tennant v. Sinclair Oil & Gas Co., 355 P.2d 887,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1960); J. Ray McDermott & Co., v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Black v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 775 P.2d 484,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Rowley v. Chicago & N. R. Co., 293 U.S. 102, 55 S. Ct. 55, 79 L. Ed. 222, 1934 U.S. LEXIS 8 (1934); Unemployment Comp. Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1943); J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 348 P.2d 73,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1962); Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Hillard, 502 P.2d 189,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1972); Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State ex rel. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 876 P.2d 989,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1994); Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1336,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1995); Laramie County Bd. of Equalization v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 915 P.2d 1184,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1996); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000); State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001); Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Remedies for Defects in General Property Tax Assessments in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 240.

For article, “Gross Products Tax,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 250.

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requirements of full-value of real property taxation assessments, 42 ALR4th 676.

§ 12. Exemptions from taxation.

The property of the United States, the state, counties, cities, towns, school districts and municipal corporations, when used primarily for a governmental purpose, and public libraries, lots with the buildings thereon used exclusively for religious worship, church parsonages, church schools and public cemeteries, shall be exempt from taxation, and such other property as the legislature may by general law provide. (As amended by Laws 1955, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 390.)

Cross references. —

As to homestead exemption, see art. 19, § 9, Wyo. Const.

For other provisions concerning exemptions from taxation, see §

39-11-105

.

Exemption limited to property used primarily for governmental purpose.—

County properly assessed property taxes on a daycare facility that a town owned and operated because the facility was not exempt from taxation as it was not used primarily for a governmental purpose. Daycare was typically and frequently carried on by private enterprise and case law and regulation established that a municipality engaged in activities that may have been and frequently were carried out by private enterprises were acting in their proprietary capacity. Eisele v. Town of Pine Bluffs, 2020 WY 22, 458 P.3d 46,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2020).

Amendment to section legally adopted. —

See Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

In determining whether the amendment to this section was not fairly adopted in view of alleged misleading statement the supreme court will assume that the people of the state voted intelligently. Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

Uniformity of taxation. —

Declaration of rights requiring uniform taxation must be construed with the revenue article. Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Plain language of section limits applicability to property taxes.

Sublette County Sch. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 770 P.2d 218,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1989).

Exemption statutes are not limited

to property similar to that exempted by the constitution. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Construction of exemption provisions. —

The courts will not construe a statute to ascribe to the legislature an intention to evade or circumvent the constitutional restraint upon its powers to exempt municipally owned property from taxation unless the violation clearly appears. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

Where the established policy of the state is to exempt publicly owned property, the view that provisions of the constitution and statutes must be strictly construed does not apply, nor does the view apply which was expressed in Commissioners of Cambria Park v. Board of County Comm'rs, 62 Wyo. 446, 174 P.2d 402,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1946), that taxation is the rule and exemption will not be presumed. City of 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

.

The amended constitution ought not to be construed as intended to stifle any activity which is for the general welfare of the people and which constitutes purely gratuitous service. Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

Time when exemption starts. —

When property has been sold for delinquent taxes and bid in for county, and certificate of purchase has been issued to county, the land is exempt from taxation. Williams v. School Dist., 56 Wyo. 1, 102 P.2d 48,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1940).

Burden is on taxing authority to establish taxability.

484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

.

Municipal property, as such, is not exempt from taxation

under the state constitution and statutes. City of Cheyenne v. Sims, 521 P.2d 1347,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1974).

But the exemption resolves itself into a question of the use,

it being exempt only “when used primarily for a governmental purpose.” City of Cheyenne v. Sims, 521 P.2d 1347,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1974).

Which is question of fact. —

The exemption of municipal property is solely dependent upon its use and is therefore solely a question of fact, and not of law or the constitutionality of a statute. City of Cheyenne v. Sims, 521 P.2d 1347,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1974).

Exemption limited to property used primarily for governmental purpose. —

This section discards ownership as the sole basis for exemption and limits the exemption of municipal property to that owned and “used primarily for a governmental purpose.” City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

The first clause of this section is a limitation upon the powers of the legislature to exempt municipally owned property from taxation; and it can only do so when such property is “used primarily for a governmental purpose.” City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

Term “governmental purpose”

is not readily amenable to precise definition and such determination is largely dependent upon the circumstances presented in each case. As a general rule, the tests utilized in fixing tort liability on the basis of whether a particular activity is governmental or proprietary may be applied. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

Property not exempt where function proprietary. —

Furnishing electric light and power to the people of a municipality through municipally owned plant is not a governmental function, but is proprietary and hence the property of such plants is not exempt from taxation. Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

But property exempt where municipality acts in governmental function. —

Where a service is rendered by a municipality gratuitously and for the public welfare generally, such as lighting streets, directing traffic and lighting offices occupied by city officers, such service constitutes a governmental function and the property of such plants to that extent is exempt from taxation. Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1958), limited, State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

Leasing of municipally owned buildings. —

The mere renting of buildings to a lessee engaged in a profit-making venture is not of itself a use for nongovernmental purposes. It depends upon the circumstances. The test is whether or not those buildings were primarily used and being so used as reasonably necessary or essential facilities to the efficient operation and maintenance of the airport. If so, the improvements were not subject to taxation. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

In considering whether or not as a general proposition buildings owned by a municipality and located upon its airport and used primarily for the housing, care, repair and service of aircraft can be said to constitute a “governmental purpose” the supreme court is impressed with the fact that the legislature apparently regarded such facilities as an essential or necessary adjunct to an airport. The mere fact that the city accomplished such use through a lessee or received rent in return for such use is not controlling. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

A “fixed base operation” is a necessary adjunct to the operation of an airport. That being true, it reasonably follows that city-owned buildings leased for use in such an operation were “used primarily for a governmental purpose” within the reach of the constitutional provision and the exemption statute. Consequently no part of those buildings was subject to county taxation. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

A city-owned building leased to a private corporation in the business of modification, repair, overhaul, conditioning and testing of aircraft, aircraft parts and incidentals for the United States of America and for others was not in use for primarily governmental purposes and was not exempt from taxation by a county. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

A city-owned building leased to an ambulance service, which although subsidized by both the city and county rendered a countywide ambulance service for which it made charges to users of the service, but which made only 3 percent of its service calls in response to airport accidents or contemplated accidents, was not exempt from taxation by the county as municipal property which was part of an airport. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

Property used “primarily” for governmental purpose. —

The city was “primarily” using the property the county wanted to tax for the express “governmental purpose” of a city hall even though the city collected rents or rented space to a state agency. State Bd. of Equalization v. City of Lander, 882 P.2d 844,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1994).

Property leased to exempt association not exempt. —

A person whose property would ordinarily be subject to taxation may not be released from bearing his share of the expense of government by simply leasing his property for a substantial rental to an association which, due to the purposes for which it was organized, is exempted from paying taxes when using property for those purposes. When a person derives income from property in such fashion he is using it for his own personal advantage and there is no valid reason why he should not pay the taxes regularly assessed to it. Commissioners of Cambria Park v. Board of County Comm'rs, 62 Wyo. 446, 174 P.2d 402,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1946).

Irrigation district. —

An irrigation district not being a municipal corporation, but being a corporation established for purposes chiefly private and with powers conferred mainly for the benefit of its own landowners, does not come within provision for tax exemptions. State ex rel. Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Hunt, 49 Wyo. 497, 57 P.2d 793,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1936).

Special assessments. —

School district property is not exempt from liability for payment of its proportionate share of special assessment for sewer line constructed by municipality in vicinity of school building. 57 Wyo. 121, 113 P.2d 958,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 24

.

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Rule that vendee in possession under contract to purchase is liable for taxes

cannot be applied so as to allow taxation of property which is declared exempt by the constitution. Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1914).

Direct Cost Ratio. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's interpretation of its own administrative rule was to be given effect because it was consistent with its statutory interpretation; royalties and production taxes were not to be included as direct costs of producing oil and gas. Excluding royalties and production taxes from the direct cost ratio provided a more reasonable interpretation.
RME Petroleum Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2007 WY 16, 150 P.3d 673,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Frank v. City of Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Memorial Hosp. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 770 P.2d 223,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1989); Deromedi v. Town of Thermopolis, 2002 WY 69, 45 P.3d 1150,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2002); Town of Thermopolis v. Deromedi, 2002 WY 70, 45 P.3d 1155,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2002); Mt. Vista Ret. Residence v. Fremont Cnty. Assessor, 2015 WY 117,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 2, 2015).

Cited in

Town of Pine Bluffs v. Eisele, 2017 WY 117, 403 P.3d 126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

§ 13. Tax must be authorized by law; law to state object.

No tax shall be levied, except in pursuance of law, and every law imposing a tax shall state distinctly the object of the same, to which only it shall be applied.

This section prohibits taxes not specifically provided by statute.

Kelsey v. Taft, 72 Wyo. 210, 263 P.2d 135,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1953).

Court cannot impose tax which legislature mentioned only by indirection. —

Under this section, the supreme court is unwarranted in “levying” or “imposing,” by judicial decree, a tax which the legislature mentioned only by indirection. Kelsey v. Taft, 72 Wyo. 210, 263 P.2d 135,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1953).

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

Section 39-6-302(g) (now see §

39-14-703

), which imposes a mineral severance tax, satisfies the requirement of this section that a law levying a tax state the object of the tax, because § 39-6-305(k) (now see §

39-14-711

) states the disposition of the tax revenue. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

Occupation tax. —

A city ordinance, levying occupation taxes, which stated that it was laid for “general revenue purposes,” and “for the purpose of raising revenue for the city during the time mentioned,” sufficiently stated purpose of tax, to comply with this section. City of Sheridan v. Litman, 32 Wyo. 14, 228 P. 628,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1924).

Where an occupation tax was authorized by §

15-1-103

(a)(xiii) it must be said that it was enacted in pursuance of law within the meaning of this section. City of Rawlins v. Frontier Ref. Co., 396 P.2d 740,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1964).

Bonds. —

The delegation of taxing authority is sufficient under either §§

18-4-301

to

18-4-303

and

18-4-306

to

18-4-310

relative to bonds generally or §§

18-4-401

to

18-4-409

relative to viaduct and subway bonds to meet the requirements set forth in this section. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Transfer of school funds. —

Where county treasurer transferred funds of plaintiff school district without high school to defendant district with high school at which plaintiff district's pupils attended without permission of plaintiff district's officials, but defendant district was only available district, the latter could, by showing that money transferred to it was in whole or in definite and separable part derived from distribution made by state or was not raised by taxation, have such money applied on its claim for tuition. School Dist. v. Jackson-Wilson High Sch. Dist., 49 Wyo. 115, 52 P.2d 673,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1935).

Interest on county funds. —

This article prevents a county treasurer from diverting the principal amount of taxes collected for a school district. Thus, because interest is an accretion or increment of the principal fund earning it and the interest follows the fund, the county treasurer, as soon as the funds are collected, should designate the principal and interest to the school district. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

The general rule that the interest is part of the taxes means that the interest on the taxes must be “applied” for the same purpose. Campbell County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Board of County Comm'rs, 884 P.2d 960,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1994).

Irrigation district law

was not violative of this section. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Statute upheld. —

The omission from ch. 102, Laws 1895, amending p. 97, § 1, Laws 1877, of the words “for ordinary county expenses” did not signify any intention to change the purpose of the tax. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Applied

in

Marathon Oil Co. v. Welch, 379 P.2d 832,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1963).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

School Dist. v. Board of Comm'rs, 15 Wyo. 73, 86 P. 24,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1906); Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

§ 14. Surrender of taxing power prohibited.

The power of taxation shall never be surrendered or suspended by any grant or contract to which the state or any county or other municipal corporation shall be a party.

Board of equalization must use full value. —

Constitutional provisions deny constitutional or implied legislatively delegable authority to the state board of equalization to set any assessment ratio which would effectively determine the actual tax, except to use full value. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied, 749 P.2d 221,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Constitutionality of Wyoming's Oil and Gas Compulsory Pooling Provision,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 300.

§ 15. State tax for support of public schools.

For the support of the public schools in the state there may be levied each year a state tax not exceeding twelve mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of the property in the state. (As added by Laws 1947, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 259; as amended by Laws 1981, House Joint Resolution No. 3, p. 328.)

Cross references. —

For another provision authorizing tax for support of schools, see art. 7, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to levy of state tax for schools, see §

21-13-303

.

Section added. —

This section was added by an amendment proposed by Laws 1947, Senate Joint Resolution No. 4, p. 259, adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 2, 1948, and proclaimed in effect December 1, 1948.

Board of equalization must use full value. —

Constitutional provisions deny constitutional or implied legislatively delegable authority to the state board of equalization to set any assessment ratio which would effectively determine the actual tax, except to use full value. Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied, 749 P.2d 221,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1988).

Unified school districts. —

For formation of unified school district joining affluent school district with poorer district, and suggestions for equalization of ad valorem taxation for school purposes, see Sweetwater County Planning Comm. v. Hinkle, 491 P.2d 1234,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1971).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).